Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7299.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-91. Homestead exemption.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, any municipality,
by ordinance, duly enacted, is authorized to annually fix the amount, if any, of a homestead
exemption with respect to assessed value from local taxation on taxable real property used for
residential purposes and to grant homestead exemptions to the owner or owners of residential real
estate in an amount not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value. The exemption only
applies to property used exclusively for residential purposes, and improved with a dwelling
containing less than four (4) units. In order to determine compliance with the homestead exemption
as outlined in this section, the municipality shall provide, by ordinance, rules and regulations
governing eligibility for the exemption established by this section.
(b) In the event property granted an exemption under this section is sold or transferred
during the year for which the exemption is claimed, the municipality, upon approval of its city or
town council, may provide for a proration of the homestead exemption in cases where title to
property passes from those not entitled to claim an exemption to those who are entitled to claim an
exemption.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any municipality that,
prior to the enactment of this section, has granted its residents a homestead exemption at a different

or higher rate, shall be exempt from the limitations imposed in that subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004084
========
LC004084 - Page 2 of 3